Hawaii statutes.
§841-18 Coroner's physician; laboratory
facilities. The medical examiner or any of the medical examiner's
assistants in the city and county of Honolulu, and any experienced or qualified
government physician designated by the coroner in the counties of Hawaii, Maui,
and Kauai, shall be the coroner's physician for such county or city and
county. The facilities of the laboratories of the state department of health
shall be made available to the coroner's physician. The term government
physician as used in this chapter means a physician employed by the State or
any of its political subdivisions. [L 1949, c 355, pt of §5; RL 1955, §260-18;
am L 1962, c 8, §2; HRS §715-18; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Before 1962 amendment, where a state physician was designated
as coroner's physician, the state physician's expenses were county
responsibility. Att. Gen. Op. 61-83.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next